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DTC P 1120/19/Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Accelerator pedal position sensor is mounted on the throttle body and it has the 2 sensors to detects the
accelerator position and a malfunction of the accelerator position’s own.

The accelerator pedal position sensor is connected with the accelerator pedal by the accelerator wire and
the voltage applied to the terminals VPA and VPA2 of the engine ECU changes between 0V and 5 V in pro-
portion to the opening angle of the accelerator pedal.

The engine ECU judges the current opening angle of the accelerator pedal from these signals input from
terminals VPA and VPA2 and the engine ECU controls the throttle motor based on these signals.

If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle motor and the magnetic clutch,
and the throttle valve is fully closed by the return spring.

However, the opening angle of the throttle valve can be controlled by the accelerator pedal through the
throttle cable.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Condition (a), (b), (c) (d) or (e) continues for 2.0 seconds:
(@ VPA = 0.2V
(b)VPA2 = 0.5V
(C)VPA = 4.8V *Openorshortin accelerat.(?r pedal position sensor circuit
P1120/19 (d)WhenVPA = 0.2Vand = 1.8V,andVPA2 = 4.97V -Acceleratorpedal position sensor
(€) VPA —-VPA2 = 0.02V,orVPA2 -VPA = 0.02V *Engine ECU
Condition (a) continues for 0.4 seconds:
(@VPA = 0.2VandVPA2 = 0.5V
HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCP1120/19usethehand  -heldtesterto confirmthe accelerator pedal opening percent-
age.
Accelerator pedal position expressed as voltage
Acceleratorpedalreleased Acceleratorpedaldepressed Trouble area
ACCELPOS#1 ACCEL POS #2 ACCEL POS #1 ACCEL POS #2
ov ov oVv ov VClineopen
ov 1.8-2.7V ov 4.7-51V VPAlineopenorgrandshort
0.3-0.9V ov 3.2-4.8V ov VPA2lineopenorgrandshort
5V 5V 5V 5V E2line open
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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*1: Only for Europe
*2: Except Europe A06629

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. If DTC P0110/31 (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction), P0115/122 (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction),
P0120/41 (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction), P1120/19 (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor
Circuit Malfunction) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.

. Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

When using hand-held tester

1 Connect hand-held tester, read the voltage for accelerator pedal position sensor
data.

PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to DLCS.

(b)  Turnthe ignition switch ON and switch the hand-held tes-
ter main switch ON.

CHECK:
Read the voltage for the accelerator pedal position sensor data.
OK:
Accelerator pedal VPA VPA2
Fi7052 Released 0.3-0.9V 1.8-2.7V
Depressed 3.2-48V 47 -51V

(See page IN-19).

OK> Check and replace engine ECU
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

@ON

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
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Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of the engine
ECU connector.

OK:

Voltage: 4.5 -55V

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

3 Check voltage between terminals VPA, VPA2 and E2 of engine ECU connector.
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PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals VPA, VPA2 and E2 of the
engine ECU connector.

OK:
Voltage
Accelerator pedal
VPA VPA2
Released 0.3-0.9V 1.8-27V
Depressed 3.2-48V 47 -51V

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU




DI-82
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

4 | Check accelerator pedal position sensor (See page Fl-45).

(See page FI-45).

NG> Replace accelerator pedal position sensor

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal
position sensor (VC, VPA,VPA2, E2 line) (See page IN-19).

Whennotusinghand -heldtester

1 Checkvoltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

@ON PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of the engine
ECU connector.

Voltage:4.5 - 5.5V

BE6653

A02365 A05001
NG> Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VPA, VPA2 and E2 of engine ECU connector.

/ \ON PREPARATION:

7)

\& VPA (+) VPA2 (+) (a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals VPA, VPA2 and E2 of the
engine ECU connector.
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OK:
V Voltage
BEooS3 u A05317 Accelerator pedal VPA VPAZ
Released 03-09V 18-27V
Depressed 3.2-48V 47-51V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

NG

3 | Check accelerator pedal position sensor (See page FI-45).

(See page FI-45).

NG> Replace accelerator pedal position sensor

OK

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal
position sensor (VC, VPA,VPA2, E2 line) (See page IN-19).
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